Massachusetts, session 194th, H4452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 33 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “10:00 a.m.” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- 8:00 a.m.
of 1